Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Enforcement

53-1-201. Injunctions authorized.

In addition to the remedies provided elsewhere in this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to apply to a court of competent jurisdiction, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of § 53-1-103(a), regardless of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-104.

53-1-202. Tagging, detention, condemnation and destruction of adulterated, misbranded and unsafe products — Correction of violations.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the commissioner finds, or has probable cause to believe, that any food, drug, device or cosmetic is adulterated, or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent, within the meaning of this chapter, the agent shall affix to the article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that the article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of the article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court.

It is unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of the detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without the permission provided for in subdivision (a)(1).

The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent shall immediately detain any depressant, stimulant or hallucinogenic drug or component of any depressant, stimulant or hallucinogenic drug, as defined by rules and regulations of the commissioner, whenever the commissioner or the commissioner's agent has reasonable grounds to believe that the articles are manufactured, held, transported or offered for sale in violation of § 53-1-103(a).

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) has been found by the agent to be adulterated or misbranded, the agent shall petition the judge of a circuit or chancery court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for an order of condemnation of the article.

When the agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, or if the agent fails to petition for an order of condemnation within fifteen (15) days of the detainer or embargo, the agent shall remove the tag or other marking.

Failure of the agent to remove the embargo or detainer or to file the petition within the fifteen-day period shall be deemed, for the purpose of entitling interested persons to a judicial review, a final order or judgment of the commissioner that the article is adulterated or misbranded, which shall be subject to review under title 27, chapter 9.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, the article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant of the detained or embargoed article, under the supervision of the agent; and all the court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be taxed against the claimant of the article or the claimant's agent; provided, that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree, and after the costs, fees and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that the article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may, by order, direct that the article be delivered to the claimant of the article for the labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the commissioner, the expense of the supervision to be paid by the claimant. The bond shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the commissioner that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter, and that the expenses of the supervision have been paid.

Whenever the commissioner or any of the commissioner's authorized agents find in any room, building, vehicle of transportation or other structure, any meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit or other perishable articles that are unsound, or contain any filthy, decomposed or putrid substance, or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit or other perishable articles being declared to be a nuisance, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent shall immediately condemn or destroy the meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit or other perishable articles or in any other manner render the meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit or other perishable articles unsalable as human food.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 6; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.6; Acts 1967, ch. 42, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-106.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

53-1-203. Prosecutions of violations — Right of party to notice and opportunity to be heard.

It is the duty of each district attorney general or city attorney to whom the commissioner reports any violation of this chapter to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts without delay and to be prosecuted in the manner required by law.

Before any violation of this chapter is reported to any district attorney general or city attorney for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present the person's views before the commissioner or the commissioner's designated agent, either orally or in writing, in person or by attorney, with regard to the contemplated proceeding.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-107.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

53-1-204. Minor violations — Written notice of warning in discretion of commissioner.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the commissioner to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter minor violations of this chapter, whenever the commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice of warning.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-108.

53-1-205. Promulgation of reasonable standards for food.

The commissioner shall promulgate regulations fixing the establishing for any food or class of food, under its common or usual name so far as practicable, a reasonable definition and standard of identity, or reasonable standard of quality or fill of container, whenever in the judgment of the commissioner the promulgation of regulations will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers.

In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for any food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the commissioner shall, for the purposes of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of the consumer, designate the optional ingredients that shall be named on the label.

The definitions and standards so promulgated shall conform to the definitions and standards promulgated under § 401 of the federal act.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-109.

Compiler's Notes. Section 401 of the federal act, referred to in this section, is a reference to § 401 of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 341.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

53-1-206. Contamination of food with micro-organisms — Permit regulations — Inspections.

Whenever the commissioner finds, after investigation, that the distribution in this state of any class of food may, by reason of contamination with micro-organisms during manufacturing, processing or packing of the food in any locality, be injurious to health, and that the injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after the articles have entered commerce, the commissioner then, and in that case only, shall promulgate regulations providing for the issuance, to manufacturers, processors or packers of that class of food in that locality, of a permit to which shall be attached conditions governing the manufacturing, processing or packing of the class of food, for a temporary period of time, that may be necessary to protect the public health; and after the effective date of the regulations, and during the temporary period, no person shall introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce any such food manufactured, processed or packed by any such manufacturer, processor or packer unless the manufacturer, processor or packer holds a permit issued by the commissioner as provided by the regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to suspend immediately, upon notice, any permit issued under authority of this section if it is found that any of the conditions of the permit have been violated.

The holder of a permit so suspended shall be privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of the permit, and the commissioner shall, immediately after prompt hearing and an inspection of the establishment, reinstate the permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit, as originally issued, or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the commissioner shall have access to any factory or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied with, and denial of access for the inspection shall be grounds for suspension of the permit until access is freely given by the operator.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-112.

53-1-207. Authority to promulgate regulations — Hearings — Notice.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this chapter is vested in the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to make regulations promulgated under this chapter conform, insofar as practicable, with those promulgated under the federal act.

Hearings authorized or required by this chapter shall be conducted by the commissioner or an officer, agent or employee that the commissioner designates for the purpose of hearings.

Before promulgating any regulation contemplated by §§ 53-1-105(a)(10), 53-1-108(4), 53-1-109(a)(6)-(8), 53-1-113(b), 53-1-205 or 53-1-206, the commissioner shall give a thirty-day notice of the proposal and of the time and place for a hearing.

The regulation promulgated shall become effective on a date fixed by the commissioner, which date shall not be prior to ninety (90) days after its promulgation.

The regulations may be amended or repealed in the same manner as is provided for their adoption; provided, that, in the case of a regulation amending or repealing a regulation, the commissioner, to the extent the commissioner deems necessary in order to prevent undue hardships, may disregard subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) regarding notice, hearing or effective date.

Storage, transportation and processing practices and standards of composition of perishable food products, including meats, poultry and seafood, shall conform to regulations set forth under this section.

Regulations shall prescribe, when necessary, code dating, open dating, or both, as well as uniform unit pricing systems. The regulations shall be consistent with federal requirements.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.21; Acts 1976, ch. 658, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-121.

Compiler's Notes. This code section is set out in the supplement to update the reference in (c)(1) from “53-1-105(10)” to “53-1-105(a)(10)” in light of amendments to that section pursuant to Acts 2020, ch. 725, § 1.

Cross-References. “Federal act” defined, § 53-1-102.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

53-1-208. Inspections — Examination of specimens.

The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent shall have free access at all reasonable hours to any factory, warehouse or establishment in which foods, drugs, devices or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed or held for introduction into commerce, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold the foods, drugs, devices or cosmetics in commerce, for the purpose of:

Inspecting the factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle to determine if this chapter is being violated; and

Securing samples or specimens of any food, drug, device or cosmetic after paying or offering to pay for the sample. It is the duty of the commissioner to make or cause to be made examination of samples secured under this section to determine whether or not this chapter is being violated;

Except as provided in subsection (d), no person shall manufacture, process, pack, or hold food for introduction into commerce unless the person holds a valid license issued by the commissioner. Applicants for licensure shall submit an application for the license on forms provided by the commissioner. The commissioner may issue a license to an applicant only upon receipt of the proper license fee and an inspection of the applicant's facility that indicates the applicant is in compliance with the requirements of this part and the rules promulgated thereunder. Licenses issued under this section shall expire on July 1 of each year or as the commissioner may otherwise provide by rule. The commissioner shall set annual fees for licenses issued under this section by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703. Notwithstanding § 43-1-704(b), the commissioner shall set fees for licenses issued under this section on or before April 1, 2018.

The commissioner shall set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703 a fee for a certificate of free sale.

No license shall be required under this section for any person who manufactures, processes, packs, or holds food for introduction into commerce, if:

The food is not potentially hazardous, as defined by departmental regulation;

The person is not subject to any license or permit requirements under § 53-3-105, § 53-3-106, § 53-7-216, § 53-7-220, or § 53-8-206;

The person introduces food into commerce only through direct retail sales to end consumers in the state;

The person employs no regular, full-time employees for the manufacturing, processing, packing, or holding of food; and

Prior to introducing the food into commerce, the person labels the food in accordance with this part and regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

Exemption from licensure requirements under this section shall not be construed to exempt any person from any other regulations applicable to the manufacturing, processing, packing, or holding of food for introduction into commerce, including, but not limited to, requirements regarding recordkeeping, sanitary operation, and availability for inspection by agencies charged with enforcing food safety laws.

A license shall not be required for the operation of a farm to consumer distribution point; provided, that the operator of the farm to consumer distribution point:

Has registered the farm to consumer distribution point with the department of revenue for purposes of paying the sales tax under any agreement entered into between a farmer and a consumer pursuant to which the farmer or the farmer's agent delivers food, produced by the farmer and previously sold to the consumer by the farmer, directly to the consumer or the consumer's agent at the farm to consumer distribution point; and

Agrees to only allow deliveries of meats produced by farmers who comply with the Tennessee Meat and Poultry Inspection Act, compiled in chapter 7, part 2 of this title to be made at the farm to consumer distribution point.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-122; Acts 2002, ch. 640, §§ 31, 32; 2015, ch. 485, §§ 30, 31; 2017, ch. 150, §§ 2, 3; 2017, ch. 272, § 2; 2020, ch. 727, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the intent of the general assembly to encourage the expansion of agricultural sales by farmers, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 272.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) The commissioner shall require that a factory, warehouse, or establishment in which foods are manufactured, processed, packed or held for introduction into commerce have a license where the factory, warehouse, or establishment is not otherwise required to be licensed pursuant to this chapter. An annual license fee shall be required based upon the following categories:“(1) For establishments where foods are manufactured, processed, or packed, the fee shall be based on the size of the establishment as follows:“Up to and including 1,000 square feet $50.00“From 1,001 through 2,000 square feet 100.00“From 2,001 through 5,000 square feet 150.00“From 5,001 through 10,000 square feet 200.00“From 10,001 through 50,000 square feet 250.00“From 50,001 through 100,000 square feet 300.00“From 100,001 through 250,000 square feet 350.00“Over 250,000 square feet 450.00“(2) For warehouses where foods are held for introduction into commerce, the fee shall be based on the size of the establishment as follows:Up to and including 50,000 square feet $75.00From 50,001 through 250,000 square feet 125.00From 250,001 through 500,000 square feet 200.00Over 500,000 square feet 300.00and (c) which read: “The commissioner shall require a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for an initial certificate of free sale and ten dollars ($10.00) for subsequent certificates relative to the same request.”.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 150 rewrote (b) which read: “(b) The commissioner shall require that a factory, warehouse, or establishment where foods are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce have a license where the factory, warehouse, or establishment is not otherwise required to be licensed pursuant to this chapter. An annual license fee shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.”; and added (d) and (e).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 272 added (f).

The 2020 amendment deleted “§ 53-2-107,” following “requirements under” in (d)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 8. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 272, § 5. May 4, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 727, § 4. June 22, 2020.

53-1-209. Access to records of carriers, consignees or holders of products in intrastate commerce.

For the purpose of enforcing this chapter, carriers engaged in intrastate commerce, and persons receiving food, drugs, devices or cosmetics in intrastate commerce or holding those articles so received, shall, upon the request of a duly authorized representative of the commissioner, permit the representative at reasonable times to have access to and to copy all records showing the movement in intrastate commerce of any food, drug, device or cosmetic, or the holding of the food, drug, device or cosmetic during or after the movement, and the quantity, shipper and consignee of the food, drug, device or cosmetic; and it shall be unlawful for the carrier or person to fail to permit the access to and the copying of the records so requested when the request is accompanied by a statement in writing specifying the nature or kind of food, drug, device or cosmetic to which the request relates; provided, that evidence obtained under this section shall not be used in criminal prosecution of the person from whom obtained; provided, further, that carriers shall not be subject to the other provisions of this chapter by reason of their receipt, carriage, holding or delivery of food, drugs, devices or cosmetics in the usual course of business as carriers.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.23; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-123.

53-1-210. Publication of reports by commissioner — Dissemination of information.

The commissioner may cause to be published, from time to time, reports summarizing all judgments, decrees and court orders that have been rendered under this part, including the nature of the charge and the disposition of the charge.

The commissioner may also cause to be disseminated information, regarding food, drugs, devices and cosmetics, that the commissioner deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the commissioner from collecting, reporting and illustrating the results of the investigations of the commissioner.

Acts 1941, ch. 120, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 6580.24; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-124.